Louisiana, session 2026, SB525.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:167.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§167.1. Filing claim based upon a purchase agreement; requirements;
prohibitions; exceptions
A. Definitions. In addition to the definitions provided in R.S. 9:153, the
following definitions shall apply to the provisions of this Section:
(1) "Executed" means a purchase agreement that is signed by all parties
or any amendment to a purchase agreement that is signed by all parties.
(2)"Purchase agreement" means a written document that transfers or
purports to transfer ownership of unclaimed property of the seller that has been
paid or delivered to the administrator by a holder, whether it be by purchase,
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2995 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 525
assignment, or any other kind of transfer. A "purchase agreement" shall
include any and all amendments, attachments, and exhibits to the document.
(3)"Seller" means a natural or juridical person who sells, assigns, or
otherwise transfers unclaimed property that has been paid or delivered to the
administrator by a holder.
B. Purchase Agreement- Property Delivered to Administrator. Any
purchase agreement that transfers ownership of unclaimed property shall be
limited to unclaimed property that has been paid or delivered to the
administrator by a holder as of the date the purchase agreement was executed.
C.(1) Requirements for Purchase Agreements. A purchase agreement
shall include the following for each piece of unclaimed property included in the
purchase agreement:
(a) Number. The identifying and publicly available number assigned by
the administrator.
(b) Name. The full legal name of the seller.
(c) Seller information. The name, last known address, email address, and
phone number of the seller.
(d) Seller former name. Any name that the seller was formerly known
by.
(e) Seller federal tax identification or social security number. The social
security number or federal taxpayer identification number of the seller, if a
number has been issued to the seller.
(f) Subsidiaries and affiliates. The name of any subsidiary or affiliate of
the seller, if the apparent owner of the property is a subsidiary or affiliate of the
seller.
(2) Information to be submitted with claim. A claim filed for recovery of
unclaimed property that is the subject of a purchase agreement shall be
accompanied by the following:
(a) Purchase agreement. A copy of the purchase agreement. The
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2995 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 525
claimant may redact information in the purchase agreement pertaining to price
or pricing terms.
(b) Authorized signatory. Documentation evidencing that the individual
who signed the purchase agreement on behalf of the seller was authorized to do
so.
(c) Proof of name change. If applicable, proof of any name changes by
the seller, if a former name change is indicated in the purchase agreement.
(d) Proof relating to subsidiaries or affiliates. If applicable, proof that the
seller had the right to sell, assign, or otherwise transfer unclaimed property for
which any subsidiary or affiliate of the seller is the apparent owner of record.
(3) Additional information. In addition to the requirements in
Paragraphs (1) and (2) of this Subsection, a claimant asserting ownership by
virtue of a purchase agreement shall provide the administrator with any
requested documents or information that the administrator determines
necessary to fulfill its duty to safe keep unclaimed property pursuant to R.S.
9:162(B).
D. Payment of Claim. The administrator shall pay a claim based upon
ownership asserted by virtue of a purchase agreement if the administrator
determines the requirements of this Section are met.
E. Denial of Claim. The administrator shall deny a claim if the
administrator determines the requirements of this Section have not been met.
F. Exceptions. This Section shall not apply to the sale or purchase of
unclaimed property:
(1) Through a bankruptcy estate representative or other person
authorized pursuant to Title 11 of the United States Code.
(2) By order of a court of competent jurisdiction, including but not
limited to a bankruptcy court.
G. Applicability. This Section shall apply to claims received by the
administrator for which ownership of unclaimed property is asserted based on
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-2995 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 525
a purchase agreement executed on or after January 1, 2027.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.